North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 3. Funding and Refunding Bonds.

§ 159-72.
Purposes for which funding and refunding bonds may be issued; when such bonds may be issued.

A unit of local government may issue funding and refunding bonds under this Article for the purposes listed in G.S. 159-48(a)(4), (5), (6), or (7). Funding bonds may be issued if the debt, judgment, or other obligation to be paid is payable at the time of the passage of the bond order or within one year thereafter. Refunding bonds may be issued at any time prior to the final maturity of the debt or obligation to be refunded. The proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows: either (i) to the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded or (ii) if not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded such proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any amounts in excess of the amounts required for such purposes, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any such excess to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds issued pursuant to

G.S. 159-78

. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in (i) direct obligations of the United States government, or (ii) obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or (iii) to the extent then permitted by law in obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or (iv) in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State of North Carolina if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of said obligations described in (i), (ii), or (iii) above having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

The principal amount of refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section, together with the principal amount of refunding bonds, if any, issued under

G.S. 159-78

in conjunction with refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section, shall not exceed the amount set forth in

G.S. 159-78

.

Except as expressly modified in this Part, funding and refunding bonds issued under the provisions of this Part shall be subject to the limitations and procedures set out in Parts 1 and 2 of this Article.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 16; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(16); C.S., s. 2937; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 8; 1929, c. 171, s. 1; 1931, c. 60, ss. 48, 54; 1933, c. 257, ss. 2-4; c. 259, ss. 1, 2; 1935, c. 302, ss. 1, 2; c. 484; 1939, c. 231, ss. 1, 2(c), 4(b); 1941, c. 147; 1943, c. 13; 1945, c. 403; 1947, cc. 520, 931; 1949, c. 354; c. 766, s. 3; c. 1270; 1953, c. 1065, s. 1; 1957, c. 266, s. 1; c. 856, s. 1; c. 1098, s. 16; 1959, c. 525; c. 1250, s. 2; 1961, c. 293; c. 1001, s. 2; 1965, c. 307, s. 2; 1967, c. 987, s. 2; c. 1001, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 11; 1977, c. 201, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on municipal finance, see 1976 Duke L.J. 1051 (1976).

§ 159-73.
Financing or refinancing agreements.

Each unit of local government is authorized to enter into agreements with the holders of its outstanding debts for the settlement, adjustment, funding, refunding, financing, or refinancing of the debt. Such an agreement may contain any provisions not inconsistent with law and before the unit may enter into it, it must be approved by the Commission.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-74.
Test cases testing validity of funding or refunding bonds.

At any time after the procedure for authorizing the issuance of funding or refunding bonds has been completed, but before the issuance of the bonds, the issuing unit may institute an action in the Superior Court Division of the General Court of Justice in the county in which all or any part of the unit lies, to determine the validity of the bonds and the validity of the means of payment provided therefor. The action shall be in rem, and shall be against all of the owners of taxable property within the unit and all citizens residing in the unit, but it shall not be necessary to name each such owner or citizen in the summons or complaint. Jurisdiction of all parties defendant shall be acquired by publication of a summons once a week for three successive weeks, and jurisdiction shall be complete within 20 days after the date of the last publication. Any interested party may intervene in the action. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the action shall be governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

1931, c. 186, ss. 4, 5; 1935, c. 290, ss. 1, 2; 1937, c. 80; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-75.
Judgment validating issue; costs of the action.

A final decree of the General Court of Justice validating funding or refunding bonds or the financing or refinancing agreement shall be conclusive as to the validity of the bonds or the agreement.

The costs of any action brought under

G.S. 159-74

shall be borne by the issuing unit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee for the attorney assigned by the court to defend the interests of the citizens and taxpayers in general.

History.

1931, c. 186, ss. 6, 7; 1935, c. 290, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 12.

§ 159-76.
Validation of bonds and notes issued before March 26, 1931.

All bonds and notes issued before March 26, 1931, for which the issuing unit received an amount of money not less than the face amount of the bonds or notes and the proceeds of which have been spent for public purposes, and all bonds and notes subsequently issued to refund all or any portion of those bonds or notes, are hereby validated notwithstanding any lack of statutory authority or failure to observe any statutory provisions concerning the issuance of the bonds or notes. This section shall not validate any bonds or notes, the proceeds of which have been lost because of the failure of a bank.

History.

1931, c. 186, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 13.

§ 159-77.
Validation of all proceedings in connection with the authorization of bonds taken before April 28, 1975.

All proceedings heretofore taken by the governing boards of units of local government in connection with the authorization of bonds are hereby ratified, approved, confirmed and in all respects validated, notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 159-61(c); provided that the issuance of said bonds shall have been approved at an election by a majority of the qualified voters of the unit voting thereon and that notice of said referendum shall have been published.

History.

1975, c. 178.

§ 159-78.
Special obligation refunding bonds.

In conjunction with the issuance of refunding bonds pursuant to

G.S. 159-72

or

G.S. 159-84

a unit of local government may issue a series of refunding bonds which shall be payable from the excess of the amount required by a trust fund established pursuant to

G.S. 159-72

or

G.S. 159-84

to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being retired and the amount required to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding to the extent such expenses are payable from said trust fund.

Such refunding bonds shall be special obligations of the municipality issuing them. The principal of and interest on such refunding bonds shall not be payable from the general funds of the municipality, nor shall they constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any of its property or upon any of its income, receipts, or revenues, except the trust fund established pursuant to

G.S. 159-72

or

G.S. 159-84

from which such refunding bonds are payable. Neither the credit nor the taxing power of the municipality is pledged for the payment of the principal or interest of such refunding bonds, and no holder of such refunding bonds has the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power of the municipality or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon. Every such refunding bond shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond is payable solely from the trust fund established for its payment and that the municipality is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from such trust fund.

Any refunding bonds issued under this section shall be issued in compliance with the procedure set forth in Article 5 of this Chapter.

The principal amount of any issue of refunding bonds issued pursuant to

G.S. 159-72

or

G.S. 159-84

, together with the principal amount of refunding bonds, if any, issued pursuant to this section in conjunction with a series of bonds issued under

G.S. 159-72

or

G.S. 159-84

, shall not exceed the sum of the following: (i) the principal amount of the obligations being refinanced, (ii) applicable redemption premiums thereon, (iii) unpaid interest on such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds, (iv) in the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as provided by G.S. 159-72 or G.S. 159-84, interest to accrue on such obligations being refinanced from the date of delivery of the refunding bonds to the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the governing body of the unit of local government, or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the governing body of the unit of local government to be most advantageous or necessary and (v) expenses, including bond discount, deemed by the governing body to be necessary for the issuance of the refunding bonds.

History.

1977, c. 201, s. 2.

§ 159-79.
Variable rate demand bonds and notes.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this Chapter to the contrary, including particularly, but without limitation, the provisions of

G.S. 159-65

,

G.S. 159-112

,

G.S. 159-123

to

G.S. 159-127

, inclusive,

G.S. 159-130

,

G.S. 159-138

,

G.S. 159-162

,

G.S. 159-164

and

G.S. 159-172

, a unit of local government, in fixing the details of general obligation bonds to be issued pursuant to this Article, general obligation notes to be issued pursuant to Article 9 of this Chapter, or project development financing debt instruments or notes to be issued pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter, may provide that the instruments or notes:

May be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner provided a Credit Facility supports such bonds or notes, unless the Commission specifically determines that a Credit Facility is not required upon a finding and determination by the Commission that the proposed bonds or notes will satisfy the conditions set forth in

G.S. 159-52

;

May be additionally supported by a Credit Facility;

May be made subject to redemption prior to maturity, with or without premium, on such notice, at such time or times, at such price or prices and with such other redemption provisions as may be stated in the resolution fixing the details of such bonds or notes or with such variations as may be permitted in connection with a Par Formula provided in such resolution;

May bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary as permitted pursuant to a Par Formula and for such period or periods of time, all as may be provided in such resolution; and

May be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made to remarket the bonds to new purchases prior to their presentment for payment to the provider of the Credit Facility or to the issuing unit.

No Credit Facility, repayment agreement, Par Formula or remarketing agreement shall become effective without the approval of the Commission.

As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Credit Facility” means an agreement entered into by an issuing unit with a bank, savings and loan association or other banking institution, an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company or other insurance institution, a corporation, investment banking firm or other investment institution, or any financial institution providing for prompt payment of all or any part of the principal (whether at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds or notes payable on demand or tender by the owner issued in accordance with this section, in consideration of the issuing unit agreeing to repay the provider of such Credit Facility in accordance with the terms and provisions of a repayment agreement. A bank may include a foreign bank or branch or agency thereof the obligations of which bear the highest rating of at least one nationally-recognized rating service and do not bear a rating below the highest rating of any nationally-recognized rating service which rates such particular obligations.

“Par Formula” shall mean any provision or formula adopted by the issuing unit to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any such bonds or notes so that the purchase price of such bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as possible.

If the aggregate principal amount repayable by the issuing unit under a repayment agreement is in excess of the aggregate principal amount of bonds or notes secured by the related Credit Facility, whether as a result of the inclusion in the Credit Facility of a provision for the payment of interest for a limited period of time or the payment of a redemption premium or for any other reason, then the amount of unissued bonds or notes during the term of such repayment agreement shall not be less than the amount of such excess, unless the payment of such excess is otherwise provided for by agreement of the issuing unit subject to the approval of the Commission. In determining whether or not to grant such approval, the Commission shall consider, in addition to such other factors it may deem relevant, the ability of the issuing unit to pay such excess from other sources without incurring additional indebtedness secured by a pledge of the faith and credit of the issuing unit or levying additional taxes and the adequacy of such other sources to accomplish such purpose.

Any bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section may be sold by the Commission at public or private sale according to such procedures as the Commission may prescribe and at such prices as the Commission determines to be in the best interest of the issuing unit, subject to the approval of the governing board of the issuing unit or one or more persons designated by resolution of the governing board of the issuing unit to approve such prices.

History.

1987, c. 585, s. 1; 2003-403, s. 5.